District of Columbia statutes.
3-1205.08a

Temporary license, registration, or certification.

A board may issue a temporary license, registration, or certification to an applicant for a fixed period of time, under conditions prescribed by the Mayor through rulemaking, who is licensed, registered, or certified and in good standing to practice in another jurisdiction.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 508a
as added July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(e)(9), 56 DCR 4043
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(e)(9) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).